Utah statutes.
38-1-4.   Amount of land affected -- Lots and subdivisions -- Franchises, fixtures, and appurtenances.

The liens granted by this chapter shall extend to and cover so much of the land whereon such building, structure, or improvement shall be made as may be necessary for convenient use and occupation of the land. In case any such building shall occupy two or more lots or other subdivisions of land, such lots or subdivisions shall be considered as one for the purposes of this chapter.  The liens provided for in this chapter shall attach to all franchises, privileges, appurtenances, and to all machinery and fixtures, pertaining to or used in connection with any such lands, buildings, structures, or improvements.

